Nebraska, session 109, LB298A.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. There is hereby appropriated (1) $680,000 from the General
Fund for FY2025-26 and (2) $680,000 from the General Fund for FY2026-27 to the
Legislative Council, for Program 129, to aid in carrying out the provisions of
Legislative Bill 298, One Hundred Ninth Legislature, First Session, 2025.
Total expenditures for permanent and temporary salaries and per diems from
funds appropriated in this section shall not exceed $590,500 for FY2025-26 or
$615,700 for FY2026-27.
Sec. 2. Section 21, Legislative Bill 261, One Hundred Ninth Legislature,
First Session, 2025, is amended to read:
Sec. 21. AGENCY NO. 3 — LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
Program No. 504 - Office of Public Counsel
FY2025-26 FY2026-27
GENERAL FUND 1,522,116 1,522,116
GENERAL FUND 2,202,116 2,202,116
PROGRAM TOTAL 1,522,116 1,522,116
PROGRAM TOTAL 2,202,116 2,202,116
SALARY LIMIT 1,403,997 1,454,309
SALARY LIMIT 1,994,497 2,070,009
The unexpended General Fund appropriation balance existing on June 30,
2025, is hereby reappropriated.
Sec. 3. Original section 21, Legislative Bill 261, One Hundred Ninth
Legislature, First Session, 2025, is repealed.
Sec. 4. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-1-